Massachusetts, session 194th, H2738.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. subsection (b) of Section 9A of Chapter 111C of the General Laws, as most
recently amended by Section 2 of Chapter 23 of the Acts of 2022, is hereby further amended by
striking out the words "basic level".
SECTION 2. Said subsection (b) of Section 9A of Chapter 111C of the General Laws, as
most recently amended by Section 2 of Chapter 23 of the Acts of 2022, is hereby further
amended by striking out the words "provided, however, that nothing in this section shall
authorize the provision of advanced life support care to a police dog;" and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed
to prohibit the provision of advanced life support care to a police dog by a person who is
of 2

otherwise qualified to render such level of care by virtue of their professional licensing under
this chapter and their training under this section;.
of 2